Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5774.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 58B FETAL ALCOHOL SPECTRUM DISORDER Sec. 5891. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Early on Michigan" means the early on program administered by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) "Fetal alcohol spectrum disorder" means a range of effects that can occur in an individual who has been prenatally exposed to alcohol, including, but not limited to, a diagnosis of fetal alcohol syndrome, partial fetal alcohol syndrome, alcohol-related neurodevelopmental disorder, static encephalopathy â alcohol exposed, neurobehavioral disorders associated with prenatal alcohol exposure, and alcohol-related birth defects. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code and part 51 contains definitions applicable to this part. Sec. 5893. A health professional who is in charge of the care of an infant and who identifies the infant as having fetal alcohol spectrum disorder shall refer the parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis of the infant to early on Michigan. Sec. 5895. The department, in consultation with the department of lifelong, education, advancement, and potential, may promulgate rules to implement this part.